Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 24. Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority.
§ 23.1-2428.
Assets of Authority; reversion to University.

Upon dissolution of the Authority, all assets of the Authority, after satisfaction of creditors, shall revert to the University.

History.

1996, cc. 905, 1046, § 23-50.16:35; 2016, c. 588.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Sovereign immunity. —

Supreme Court likely would find VCU Health System Authority to be an arm of the Commonwealth and therefore entitled to absolute immunity. Even if the Court were not to agree, however, VCU Health System Authority also satisfies the criteria of a quasi-municipal corporation and therefore would be entitled to immunity for governmental functions. The Virginia Tort Claims Act exposes the Commonwealth, but not VCU Health System Authority, to limited liability for the negligent acts of its employees. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable James P. “Jimmie” Massie III, Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 17-005, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 26 (12/7/17).